Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-238
Mineral interest; separate listing; appeal.

Appeals from actions of the county assessor pursuant to sections 57-235 to 57-239 may be taken to the county board of equalization in the manner provided in Chapter 77, article 15.

Laws 1981, LB 59, § 4.